src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
# Inari Saami number <-> text

* **LEXICON num**

* **LEXICON numsg**

* **LEXICON KYEHTI**

* **LEXICON OHTA**

* **LEXICON KULMA** maaŋgâi

* **LEXICON VITTA**

* **LEXICON KULMA_VITTA**

* **LEXICON CICCAM** to be checked

* **LEXICON iLOV**

* **LEXICON iLOVE**

* **LEXICON LOV_OBLi**

* **LEXICON LOV**

* **LEXICON plussLOVE**

* **LEXICON LOV_OBL**

* **LEXICON hcLOV**

* **hcLOV_OBL ;**

* **LEXICON hcLOV_OBL**

* **LEXICON ttLOV**

* **LEXICON ttLOVE**

* **LEXICON LOV_OBLtt**

* **LEXICON mLOV**

* **LEXICON mLOVE**

* **LEXICON mLOV_OBL**

* **LEXICON NUBALOH**

* **LEXICON LOVE**

* **LEXICON LOVE-COMMON**

* **LEXICON CYETI**

* **LEXICON ORDINALInfl**

* **LEXICON CICCADInfl**

* **LEXICON ORD-SAS**

* **LEXICON nubbecase**

* **LEXICON num-imprecise**

* **LEXICON num-imprecise-case**

* **LEXICON yeartagpl**

* **LEXICON dateyearcase**

* **LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff**

* **LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot**

* **LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff** all cases

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON DIGITCASES**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE0**

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL**

* **LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>

---
